New York, session 2025-2026, S3106.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 167 of the state finance law, as 2 added by chapter 83 of the laws of 1995, is amended to read as follows: 3 1. The head of a state agency having custody or control of such prop- 4 erty, except vehicles, may: (a) dispose of such property in accordance 5 with applicable express statutory provisions, (b) reuse such property 6 within the same state agency, (c) use the property in part payment on a 7 new item which may include, but shall not be limited to, use as a trade- 8 in or use in a guaranteed brokerage arrangement, (d) with the consent of 9 the commissioner, place such property in the custody or control of the 10 office of general services for reuse by other state agencies or for 11 other disposition, or (e) where the fair market value of such property 12 is less than an amount established from time to time by the commission- 13 er, dispose of such property by such means as the head of such state 14 agency deems to be in the best interest of the state or donate such 15 property to a 501(c)(3) not-for-profit organization that is up to date 16 on their annual filings. Records of each disposition shall be retained 17 by the state agency disposing of such property and shall be subject to 18 audit. Where personal property has been purchased from special funds, a 19 state agency, upon designation of the source of funds from which such 20 property was purchased, may condition the disposal of such property on 21 the reimbursement of such special fund in the amount of the fair market 22 value of such property. All proceeds realized on sale or other transfer EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03178-01-5 S. 3106 2 1 and not otherwise authorized to be deposited in a special fund, shall be 2 deposited in the general fund of the state. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 4 it shall have become a law.